Hawaii, session 2026, SB3096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 88-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Commencing with fiscal year 2005-2006 and each subsequent fiscal year until fiscal year 2007-2008, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on fifteen and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and thirteen and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees. Commencing with fiscal year 2008-2009 and each subsequent fiscal year until fiscal year 2011-2012, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on nineteen and seven-tenths per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and fifteen per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2012-2013, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-two per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and fifteen and one-half per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2013-2014, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-three per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and sixteen per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2014-2015, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-four per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and sixteen and one-half per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees. Commencing with fiscal year 2015-2016 until fiscal year 2016-2017, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-five per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and seventeen per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2017-2018, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-eight per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and eighteen per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2018-2019, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups in subsection (a) shall be based on thirty-one per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and nineteen per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  In fiscal year 2019-2020, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups in subsection (a) shall be based on thirty-six per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and twenty-two per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  Commencing with fiscal year 2020-2021 and each subsequent fiscal year[,] until fiscal year 2025-2026, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups in subsection (a) shall be based on forty-one per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and twenty-four per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  Commencing with fiscal year 2026-2027 and each subsequent fiscal year, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on forty-four per cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and twenty-four per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.  The contribution rates shall amortize the total unfunded accrued liability of the entire plan over a period not to exceed the maximum funding period. The contribution rates shall be subject to adjustment: (1)  If the actual period required to amortize the unfunded accrued liability exceeds the maximum funding period; (2)  If there is no unfunded accrued liability; or (3)  Based on the actuarial investigation conducted in accordance with section 88-105." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST